North Carolina statutes. Chapter 1C. Enforcement of Judgments.
Article 17A. Enforcement of Foreign Judgments for Noncompensatory Damages. [Repealed]

§ 1C-1750.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-19, s. 1, effective April 23, 2003.

§§ 1C-1751 through 1C-1759.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 1C-1760.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-19, s. 1, effective April 23, 2003.

§§ 1C-1761 through 1C-1799.

Reserved for future codification purposes.